California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) An owner who agrees to have his or her property designated as a California natural landmark does not give up without his or her consent, under state law, any legal rights and privileges of ownership or use of the property.

(d) The department does not gain a property interest in a California natural landmark by virtue of that designation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5863.

(a) Except as provided in Section 5872, a potential California natural landmark shall be identified only in the following manner:

(1) An owner may request the department to designate his or her property as a California natural landmark. If the designation is proposed to apply to multiple properties, the proposal shall include the written consent of the owners of all included properties.

(2) (A) Upon the owner initiating a request pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall prepare an estimate of the cost of studies to determine whether the property qualifies as a California natural landmark; the department’s costs, including administrative and staffing costs, in determining whether to designate the property as a California natural landmark; and any other costs attributed to making those determinations. The department shall also prepare a list of scientists qualified to do any studies required to determine whether the property should be designated as a California natural landmark. The list shall include both scientists employed by the state and scientists not employed by the state. A qualified scientist shall be familiar with the natural region and its types of biological and geological features.

(B) The revenues collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Natural Landmarks Program Administration Fund, which is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury. The department may expend the moneys in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of administering the California Natural Landmarks Program.

(3) (A) An owner who initiates a request to designate his or her property as a California natural landmark is responsible for all costs of determining whether the property qualifies for that designation, as well as any costs of actual designation, including the costs of the department.

(B) (i) If the owner accepts the estimate prepared pursuant to paragraph (2), and wishes to continue with the request for his or her property to be designated as a California natural landmark, he or she shall agree in writing to pay the costs estimated by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) and choose a scientist from the list prepared by the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) to do any required studies. The department may require the owner to post security for costs he or she has agreed in writing to pay pursuant to this section.

(ii) The owner may at any time cancel his or her request for California natural landmark designation and any studies being conducted pursuant to that request, and is responsible only for costs incurred in pursuit of that designation prior to the cancellation. If the owner cancels his or her request for California natural landmark designation, or the designation is denied, information already submitted or developed at the expense of the owner shall be returned to him or her.

(b) (1) The department, as well as any scientist performing studies required by the department to make a determination of whether to designate property as a California natural landmark, shall obtain the owner’s permission before entering the owner’s property for purposes of this chapter, except when the property is publicly owned and open to the public. The owner shall not unreasonably withhold permission.

(2) The department may make a determination regarding the property, required by this chapter, using other information, including information that was previously gathered by other federal or California agencies or gained from other scientific studies. The department shall notify the owner if it makes a determination regarding his or her property from existing information that does not require the department to enter the owner’s property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5864.

(a) The department shall use the state significance criteria in Section 5868 to evaluate the potential California natural landmark. The department shall evaluate the potential California natural landmark on a statewide and regional basis, and may compare similar areas that represent a particular type of feature located in the same natural region to identify examples that are among the most illustrative and have the most integrity.

(b) The evaluation required by subdivision (a) shall be performed by the scientist chosen by the owner pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5863. The scientist shall make a detailed description of the area, and assess its statewide and regional standing using the state significance criteria in Section 5868 and any additional information provided by the department.

(c) At least three peer reviewers, who are scientists familiar with the biological or geological features of the area or natural region, shall review the evaluation completed pursuant to subdivision (b). The peer reviewers shall provide the department with information on the scientific merit and strength of supportive documentation in the evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5865.

(a) On the basis of the evaluation and the findings of the peer reviewers, made pursuant to Section 5864, the department shall determine either that the property does or does not appear to qualify for California natural landmark designation or that it requires additional information before a decision regarding the property’s designation as a California natural landmark can be made.

(b) If the department determines that the property does not appear to qualify for California natural landmark designation, the department shall notify the owner in writing of that determination, including reasons therefor.

(c) (1) If the department determines that the property meets the state significance criteria in Section 5868, the department shall notify the owner in writing of that determination. The department shall include in the notice, all of the following:

(A) The procedures that the department follows in making its determination.

(B) The effect of California natural landmark designation, as defined in Section 5861 and as described in Section 5862.

(C) A copy of the evaluation made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5864.

(D) An opportunity for the owner to comment.

(2) (A) The department shall also notify appropriate interested parties of the determination as the director deems appropriate, including all of the following:

(i) The executive of both the city and county in which the property is located.

(ii) The Governor.

(iii) Members of the Legislature who represent the district in which the property is located.

(B) The notice shall include both of the following:

(i) The procedures that the department follows in making its determination.

(ii) The effect of California natural landmark designation, as described in Section 5862.

(3) Notification of and receipt of any comments pursuant to this section are the department’s responsibility, and the department shall not delegate that responsibility to a representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5866.

(a) The department shall review all documentation related to designation of the property as a California natural landmark, including, but not limited to, the evaluation and peer review findings made pursuant to Section 5864 and comments received pursuant to Section 5865, to determine whether the property meets the state significance criteria in Section 5868.

(b) If the department determines that the property does not meet the state significance criteria in Section 5868, the department shall notify the owner in writing, as well as interested parties notified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5865, that the property is no longer being considered for California natural landmark designation.

(c) The director shall review the documentation specified in subdivision (a) that demonstrates that the property meets the state significance criteria in Section 5868.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5867.

(a) If the director determines that the requirements of this chapter are met for California natural landmark designation, including the consent of the owner to that designation, the director shall designate the property as a California natural landmark.

(1) If the director designates the property as a California natural landmark, the department shall notify the owner, as well as interested parties notified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5865, of that designation.

(2) The property shall be added to the California Registry of Natural Landmarks.

(b) (1) If the owner of the property requests it, after the director designates the property as a California natural landmark, the department may provide the owner, at no cost to the owner, with a certificate, signed by the director, that recognizes the owner’s interest in protecting and managing the property in a manner that prevents the loss or deterioration of the values on which California natural landmark designation is based.

(2) The department may also provide, at the cost of the owner, a plaque for display in or near the California natural landmark. Upon the owner’s request, and to the extent the department’s resources permit, the department may help arrange and participate in a presentation ceremony. After presentation of a plaque, the department retains ownership of the plaque. If the California natural landmark designation is rescinded, the department may reclaim the plaque.

(3) By accepting a certificate or plaque, the owner does not give up any of the rights or privileges of ownership or use of the California natural landmark, and the department does not acquire any interest in the California natural landmark.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5868.

Property may be considered for designation if its significant features are either of natural origin and remain largely wild and undisturbed, or have the salient characteristics of natural features, including function and appearance, but have been subject to human intervention or use. The department shall use the following criteria to evaluate whether a property is one of state significance:

(a) Primary criteria for a specific type of natural feature is the main basis for selection of property as being of state significance. Primary criteria consist of both of the following:

(1) Illustrative character, which requires the property to exhibit a combination of well-developed components that are recognized in the appropriate scientific literature as characteristic of a particular type of natural feature. Generally, the property should be unusually illustrative, rather than merely statistically representative.

(2) Present conditions, which require that the integrity of the significant features of the property has been maintained, enhanced, or restored.

(b) Secondary criteria may be used to supplement the comparison of two or more similar properties pursuant to the primary criteria specified in subdivision (a). Secondary criteria consist of all of the following:

(1) Diversity, which requires property, in addition to its primary natural feature, to contain high quality examples of other biological or geological features or processes.

(2) Rarity, which requires property, in addition to its primary natural feature, to contain rare geological or paleontological features or natural communities, or to provide high quality habitat for one or more rare, threatened, or endangered species.

(3) Value for science and education, which requires the property to contain known or potential information as a result of its association with a significant scientific discovery, concept, or exceptionally extensive and long-term record of onsite research, with the result that the property offers unusual opportunity for public interpretation of the natural history of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5869.

(a) (1) The department may modify California natural landmark boundaries, or revise information about a California natural landmark, if it determines that modification or revision is necessary. Before considering a proposed modification or revision, the department shall consult with the affected owner.

(2) (A) Federal, state, or local agencies, as well as other public and private organizations or individuals, may suggest to the department modifications of California natural landmark boundaries or revisions of information about a California natural landmark.

(B) The department shall determine the validity of a suggestion made pursuant to subparagraph (A) by applying the state significance criteria in Section 5868 or by conducting additional studies.

(b) Before the department expands the boundaries of a California natural landmark, it shall determine that one of the following apply:

(1) There is better documentation of the extent of features of state significance.

(2) There was professional error in the original designation of the California natural landmark.

(3) The owner of the land included in the proposed expansion has requested that their property be included in the California natural landmark.

(c) If the department determines that expansion of a California natural landmark’s boundaries is appropriate, the department shall use the designation process outlined in Sections 5864, 5865, and 5866 to expand the boundaries. All of the owners of the property into which the boundaries are expanded, as well as the owner of the previously designated property, are required to agree to the expansion.

(d) Before the department reduces the boundaries of a California natural landmark, it shall determine that one of the following apply:

(1) There has been loss of integrity of the natural features of the California natural landmark, but not to the extent that requires the rescission of the landmark designation.

(2) There was professional error in the original designation of the California natural landmark.

(3) A landowner has requested the reduction or rescission of designation.

(e) If the department determines that reduction of a California natural landmark’s boundaries is appropriate, the department shall follow the designation rescission process specified in Section 5870.

(f) (1) If the department determines, with the consent of the owner, that a change in the description of a California natural landmark’s values of state significance is appropriate, the department shall prepare the recommended changes.

(2) The director shall review the information and based on that information may approve changes in the description of the California natural landmark’s values of state significance.

(g) (1) The director may approve minor technical corrections to the boundaries of a California natural landmark, as well as other administrative changes in landmark documentation not covered in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), minor technical boundary corrections are those that involve a change in less than 5 percent of the total area of the California natural landmark, and to which the owner of the California natural landmark agrees.

(3) The department shall notify the owner of a California natural landmark for which minor technical boundary corrections or other administrative changes in documentation are being considered. Based on the owner’s response to the notification, the department shall determine whether the proposed change is a minor technical correction to landmark documentation that can be made administratively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5870.

(a) The department shall rescind a California natural landmark designation if one or more of the following circumstances apply:

(1) The owner of a California natural landmark requests the department to rescind that designation.

(2) An error in professional judgment was made in such a manner that the site did not meet the criteria for state significance at the time it was designated.

(3) The values that originally qualified the California natural landmark for designation have been significantly degraded, lost, or destroyed, as demonstrated by evidence provided to the director.

(4) Applicable designation procedures were not followed because of prejudicial procedural error.

(b) (1) An owner of a California natural landmark may initiate rescission of the designation by submitting to the director a request for rescission of designation, stating the reason therefor. Upon a determination that the request is complete, the designation shall either be rescinded pursuant to the procedures of this section or, if the landmark has other owners as well, its boundaries shall be amended pursuant to Section 5869 and this section to exclude the owner’s land.

(2) Within 60 days of receiving a rescission request, the director shall notify the person who submitted the request of whether the department considers the documentation sufficient to consider rescission of California natural landmark designation, or whether the boundaries will be amended to exclude the owner’s land.

(c) The department shall review the information outlining the grounds for rescission of California natural landmark status. When the department determines it is necessary, an onsite evaluation of the area may be made, using the procedure described in Sections 5863 and 5864. Based on all available information, the department shall determine whether the California natural landmark no longer merits that designation.

(d) (1) If the department determines that a California natural landmark no longer merits that designation, the department shall notify the owner and interested parties specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5865.

(2) (A) The owner and other interested parties notified pursuant to paragraph (1) may comment within 60 days of the date of the notice.

(B) The director shall consider all comments received pursuant to subdivision (A) in the review and decision to rescind California natural landmark designation.

(e) The director shall review the information about a recommended rescission of the California natural landmark designation and determine whether the procedural requirements of this section have been met. If the director confirms that those requirements have been met and that one or more of the circumstances specified in subdivision (a) apply, he or she shall rescind the designation and remove the property from the California Registry of Natural Landmarks. Any property from which designation as a California natural landmark is rescinded because of prejudicial procedural error described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) continues to meet the criteria for state significance.

(f) If a California natural landmark is removed from the California Registry of Natural Landmarks, the department shall notify in writing the owner of the landmark and interested parties specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5865. The department may reclaim a California natural landmark plaque when a landmark is removed from the California Registry of Natural Landmarks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5871.

(a) The department may enter into a contract or other type of agreement with another state agency, federal agency, local agency, private organization, owner, Native American tribal government, or other interested individual or group, to assist in administering the California Natural Landmarks Program. The contract or agreement may include, but is not limited to, provisions about identification, evaluation, or monitoring a California natural landmark. However, any contract or agreement shall not authorize an entity, other than the department, to administer the provisions of this act with respect to an individual natural landmark, without the consent of the owner of the property included within the landmark.

(b) The department may conduct educational and scientific activities to disseminate information on California natural landmarks, the California Natural Landmarks Program, and benefits derived from systematic surveys of significant natural features, to the general public, interested local, state, and federal agencies, and private groups. The department may restrict information on ecologically or geologically fragile or sensitive areas, if release of that information may endanger or harm the sensitive resources.

(c) The owner of a designated California natural landmark may disseminate information about the property’s status as a natural landmark in educational and other potential materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5872.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to facilitate the cost-effective use of the program with respect to interpretive activities for its own lands, the department may develop and adopt streamlined and expedited procedures for designating property that it owns as a California natural landmark.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5873.

(a) Designation of an area as a California natural landmark shall not constitute a change in the environment, as defined by Section 21060.5, and designation of an area as a California natural landmark is not a project pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(b) An action by the director or the department pursuant to this chapter modifying or rescinding the designation of a California natural landmark shall be exempt from the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(c) If the designation of an area as a natural landmark is referenced or referred to in a document prepared pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) for a project in or near a designated area, the designation shall not be considered part of the environment pursuant to Section 21060.5, or in evaluating the “significant effect on the environment” of that project pursuant to Section 21068.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center [5875. - 5877.]

5875.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “County” means the County of Los Angeles.

(b) “Cultural center” means the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center.

(c) “Panel” means the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center Development Advisory Panel.

(d) “SELA” means southeast Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 44.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 5877.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 5877.)
-------------------------------------------

5876.

(a) The Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center Development Advisory Panel is hereby created to provide advice to the state and to the county in the development of the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center. The panel shall be convened by the department within 60 days of completion of appointments to the panel pursuant to subdivision (e).

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the objectives of the panel include all of the following:

(1) Advise the department, the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, and the county on the logistics for completing construction and opening the cultural center to the SELA community by 2028.

(2) Develop and recommend a vision for the cultural center that supports the existing SELA community, particularly SELA artists of all kinds, including the development of partnerships that support the cultural center.

(3) On or before December 31, 2024, establish a work plan to set deadlines for completing the panel’s work as outlined in subdivision (c).

(c) The duties and responsibilities of the panel shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Advising on the design, ownership, operations, and governance of the cultural center.

(2) By January 1, 2027, developing a recommended operations plan for the cultural center, which shall not include a commitment of ongoing state
 resources. The operations plan shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following elements:

(A) A proposed operating model with a recommendation for an operator or operators of the cultural center.

(B) An analysis of annual operational costs and needs, including potential staffing and maintenance costs.

(3) Ongoing community engagement efforts for the cultural center’s development, including the following:

(A) Community outreach.

(B) Public convening.

(C) Relations with local governments, state agencies, and tribal communities.

(D) Relations with SELA
 artists and schools.

(E) Promotion of the cultural center and its services.

(4) Building partnerships with, and among, the state, the county, SELA community groups, SELA cities, and other local agencies, artists, arts organizations, schools, colleges, and universities, to create arts and cultural education and programming that serves the SELA community.

(5) Promoting public accessibility and connectivity between the cultural center and its communities.

(6) Identifying potential models for funding the construction and operation of the cultural center, including public and private partnerships.

(d) The panel shall be chaired by the director and may be cochaired by the county supervisor
 representing the SELA region for the fourth supervisorial district, or by their designees.

(e) The panel shall consist of nine other voting members if the county supervisor described in subdivision (d) elects to participate, or seven other voting members if the county supervisor does not elect to participate, who shall serve for two years and shall be eligible for reappointment, to pursue the objectives described in subdivision (b) as follows:

(1) If the county supervisor described in subdivision (d) elects to participate in the panel, the county supervisor may appoint two members representing a county agency or the SELA community.

(2) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall appoint seven members as follows:

(A) One representative of the
 SELA community with experience in municipal parks, arts, or recreation programs.

(B) Two representatives of SELA community artist nonprofit organizations.

(C) One representative, 21 years of age or under, of SELA community youth.

(D) One representative of a philanthropic nonprofit organization dedicated to promotion of the arts.

(E) One representative of the Los Angeles Philharmonic Association.

(F) One representative from the local tribal community.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the panel include persons, agencies, and organizations that may own or operate the cultural center’s activities upon its completion.
 Nothing in this section shall create a prohibited conflict of interest that would prevent a panel member who represents a government agency or nonprofit organization or their agency or nonprofit organization from owning, operating, or participating in the operation of the cultural center.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to interfere in the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy’s work and legal duties to develop and construct the cultural center.

(h) The state shall provide a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) and reimbursement for necessary and actual travel expenses for attendance at panel meetings by nongovernmental panel members, in accordance with state reimbursement policies and rates.

(i) The meetings of the panel shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open
 Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(j) The cultural center shall not receive ongoing commitments of state resources for operation and maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 44.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 5877.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 5877.)
-------------------------------------------

5877.

This chapter shall become inoperative on July 1, 2032, and, as of January 1, 2033, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 44.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 14, commencing with Section 5875.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5.8. CALIFORNIA WILDLIFE, COASTAL, AND PARK LAND CONSERVATION ACT [5900. - 5938.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5900. - 5903.]

5900.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Act.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

The people of California find and declare all of the following:

(a) Parks, wildlife habitat, beaches, and open-space lands are vital to maintaining the quality of life in California. As the state’s population increases, it is of growing importance to provide parks and recreational opportunities to the residents of California.

(b) Preservation of California’s
 unique natural heritage is in the interest of all Californians.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Conservation easement” means an interest in real property as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code.

(b) “District” means any regional park or open-space district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5 and any recreation and park
 district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780) of Division 5. With respect to any community or unincorporated region which is not included within a regional park or open-space district or a recreation and park district and in which no city or county provides parks or recreational areas or facilities, “district” also means any other district which is authorized by statute to operate and manage parks or recreational areas or facilities, employs a full-time park and recreation director and offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by the district, and allocates a substantial portion of its annual operating budget to parks or recreation areas or facilities.

(c) “Fund” means the California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Fund of 1988 created pursuant to Section 5906.

(d) “Historical resource” includes, but is not
 limited to, any building, structure, site areas, or place which is historically or archeologically significant, or is significant in the architectural, engineering, scientific, economic, agricultural, educational, social, political, military, or cultural annals of California.

(e) “Historical preservation project” means a project designed to preserve an historical resource which is either listed in the National Register of Historic Places or is registered as either a state historical landmark or point of historical interest pursuant to Section 5021.

(f) “Local coastal program” means any program created under Section 30108.6. 

(g) “Natural lands” means an area of relatively undeveloped land which (1) has substantially retained its characteristics as provided by nature or has been substantially restored, or which can be
 feasibly restored, to a near-natural condition, and which has outstanding wildlife, scenic, open-space, or park resources, or a combination thereof, or (2) meets the definition of open-space land in Section 65560 of the Government Code.

(h) “Nonprofit organization” means any charitable organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which has among its primary purposes the conservation and preservation of wetlands or of lands predominantly in their natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition.

(i) “Park” means a tract of land with outstanding scenic, natural, open-space, or recreational values, set apart to conserve natural, scenic, cultural, or ecological resources for present and future generations, and to be used by the public as a place for rest, recreation, education, exercise, inspiration, or enjoyment.

(j) “Riparian habitat” means lands that contain habitat which grows close to and which depends upon soil moisture from a nearby freshwater source.

(k) “Stewardship” means the development and implementation of major programs for the protection, rehabilitation, restoration, and enhancement of the basic natural systems and outstanding scenic features of the state park system. It does not mean the maintenance or alteration of facilities, developments, or any physical installations whose original purpose was not the protection of natural scenic resources.

(l) “Wetlands” means lands which may be covered periodically or permanently with shallow water and which include saltwater marshes, freshwater marshes, open or closed brackish water marshes, swamps, mudflats, fens, and vernal pools.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

For the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, “state grant” or “state grant moneys” means moneys received by the state from the sale of bonds authorized by law for the purposes of this division which are available for grants to counties, cities, cities and counties, districts, and nonprofit organizations.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Program [5905. - 5907.5.]

5905.

Wildlife, coastal, and park land conservation is in the public interest and is necessary to keep these lands in open-space, natural, and recreational uses, to provide clean air and water, to protect significant environmental and scenic values of wildlife and plant habitat, riparian and wetland areas, and other open-space lands, and to provide opportunities for the people of California to enjoy, appreciate, and visit natural environments and recreational areas.

It is the intent of the People of California in enacting this division that it be carried out in the most expeditious manner possible, and that all state officials implement this division to the fullest extent of their authority.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5906.

The California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Fund of 1988 is hereby created.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5907.

All money deposited in the fund shall be available for expenditure, in accordance with Section 5921, for the purposes set forth below, in amounts not to exceed the following:

(a) One hundred sixty-six million dollars ($166,000,000) to the Department of Parks and Recreation for grants to counties, cities, cities and counties, districts, and nonprofit organizations for acquisition, development, rehabilitation,
 or restoration of real property for parks, beaches, wildlife habitat, natural lands, recreation, or preservation of historical resources, including an amount not to exceed two million four hundred ninety thousand dollars ($2,490,000) for state administrative costs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) One hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) for grants to counties, cities, and districts on a per capita basis for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for parks, beaches, wildlife habitat, natural lands, and recreation, except that each county is entitled to not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(2) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for expenditure by the Department of Parks and Recreation for the purpose of the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with
 Section 5620) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code).

(3) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for competitive grants for park, beach, and recreational purposes to public agencies which provide significant park and recreational opportunities to the general public and are not eligible for grants pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) for competitive grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of historical or archeological resources and for historical and archeological resources preservation projects and costs of planning and interpretation. Not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be used for archeological resources preservation purposes.

(5) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for competitive grants to
 public agencies and nonprofit organizations for acquisition and development of land and rights-of-way for bicycle, horse, hiking, and handicapped access trails.

(b) Three hundred thirty-eight million seven hundred thousand dollars ($338,700,000) to the Department of Parks and Recreation for acquisition of parklands, wildlife habitat, coastal, and natural lands in California, and for grants to local agencies and nonprofit organizations, including an amount not to exceed five million eighty thousand five hundred dollars ($5,080,500) for state administrative costs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Ninety-eight million six hundred thousand dollars ($98,600,000) to the Department of Parks and Recreation for acquisition of real property in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) Twelve million dollars
 ($12,000,000) for acquisition of land for the California Redwood State Parks, including, but not limited to, Big Basin Redwoods, Butano, Calaveras Big Trees, Forest of Nisene Marks, Hendy Woods, Humboldt Lagoons, Humboldt Redwoods, Jedediah Smith Redwoods, Portola, Prairie Creek Redwoods, Richardson Grove, and Sinkyone Wilderness State Parks; Benbow Lake State Recreation Area, Fort Ross State Historical Park, and Paul M. Dimmick State Wayside Campground; provided that each dollar up to at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) from the funds to be spent pursuant to this subparagraph shall be matched with an equal amount in money or property from private gifts, city or county appropriations, or alternative sources other than the State of California.
